Hawaii statutes.
[§166-3.5] Commercial activity. The
department may allow, in each of its existing and future agricultural parks,
the disposition of no more than two lots within an agricultural park for the
processing, marketing, and displaying of agricultural crops or commodities,
which shall include any product created through value-added processes as
defined by rules adopted by the board. The department shall allow
agricultural-based commercial venture operations that may sell to the general
public; provided that any such lots shall be leased and operated by an
agricultural park lessee in good standing with the department. [L 1999, c 277,
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next